Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-732
Diploma of high school equivalency; State Board of Education; rules and regulations; adopt.

The State Board of Education shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the administration of sections 79-730 to 79-732, and the decision of the State Board of Education with reference to the eligibility of an applicant for a diploma of high school equivalency shall be final.

Laws 1959, c. 399, § 3, p. 1359;

Laws 1975, LB 449, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,147.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 406.